Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1444
Law enforcement reserve officer; bond.

No appointment of a law enforcement reserve officer shall be valid until a bond in the amount of two thousand dollars, payable to the county or city, has been filed with the clerk of the county or city by the individual appointed or a blanket surety bond arranged and paid for by the governing body and bonding all such officers of the governing body has been filed. Such bonds shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 11, article 1.

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 771, § 1.